California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 electrical corporation costs associated with the installation of new transmission and distribution assets to serve new data centers or expansions of existing data centers, including the costs of stranded assets and assets installed for an entity that ceases operation.

(3) Identification of opportunities to prevent or mitigate any substantial cost shifts, if the cost shifts are identified.

(b) The commission shall submit
 an
 assessment completed pursuant to this section to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature and publicly post a copy of the assessment on the commission’s internet website on or before January 1, 2027.

(c) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 647, Sec. 3.   (SB 57)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

914.

The commission shall annually report the information required to be reported by public utilities pursuant to Section 7912, to the Assembly Committee on Utilities and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Energy, Utilities and Communications, or their successor committees, and within a reasonable time thereafter, shall make the information available to the public on its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 41.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

914.1.

The commission shall annually report to the Legislature, in a document that can be made public, information relative to the actions undertaken by the commission implementing the lifeline telecommunications universal service program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 873.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 42.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

914.2.

The commission, in its annual report prepared pursuant to Section 914.1, shall assess whether having telephone corporations provide the name and address of its lifeline customers to other public utilities for the purpose of low-income ratepayer assistance outreach efforts has been helpful in the low-income ratepayer assistance outreach efforts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 43.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

914.3.

By December 31 of each year, the commission shall submit to the Governor and the Legislature a report that includes, based on yearend data, on an aggregated basis, the information submitted by holders pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5960. All information reported by the commission pursuant to this section shall be disclosed to the public only as provided for pursuant to Section 583. No individually identifiable customer or subscriber information shall be subject to public disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 36.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

914.4.

The commission shall annually report the information required to be reported by holders of state franchises pursuant to Section 5920, to the Assembly Committee on Utilities and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Energy, Utilities and Communications, or their successor committees, and within a reasonable time thereafter, shall make the information available to the public on its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 45.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

914.6.

The commission shall report to the Legislature and the Governor annually on the effectiveness of the program administered pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 280.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 47.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

914.7.

By April 1, 2019, and by April 1 of each year thereafter, the commission shall provide to the Legislature either a report or the biennial fiscal and performance audit conducted pursuant to Section 912.2 that includes all of the following information:

(a) The remaining unserved areas in the state.

(b) The amount of funds expended from the California Advanced Services Fund in the prior year.

(c) The recipients of funds expended from the California Advanced Services Fund in the prior year.

(d) The geographic regions of the state affected by funds expended from the California Advanced Services Fund
 in the prior year, including information by county.

(e) The expected benefits to be derived from the funds expended from the California Advanced Services Fund in the prior year.

(f) Details on the status of each project funded through the California Advanced Services Fund and whether the project has been completed or the expected completion date of the project.

(g) Actual broadband adoption levels from funds expended from the California Advanced Services Fund in the prior year.

(h) The cost per household for each project.

(i) The number of formerly unserved households subscribing to broadband service in areas covered by projects funded by the California Advanced Services Fund.

(j) The number of subscriptions resulting from the broadband adoption program funded by the California Advanced Services Fund.

(k) An update on the expenditures from the California Advanced Services Fund, broadband adoption levels, the progress in achieving the goals of the program, and an accounting of the remaining unserved households in each region of the state as of December 31 of the immediately preceding year.

(l) The amount of funds expended from the California Advanced Services Fund to match federal funds.

(m) Additional details on efforts to leverage non-California Advanced Services Fund moneys.

(n) The status of the California Advanced Services Fund balance and the projected
 amount to be collected in each year to fund approved projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 658, Sec. 5.   (AB 14)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

916.

On or before November 30 of each year, the commission shall report to the Legislature on its rail safety activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 50.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

916.1.

The commission shall annually report the results of its investigation pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 7661 relative to any incident that results in a notification required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7661, including its findings concerning the cause or causes of the incident and any action undertaken by the commission in response to those findings. The commission may include the information required to be reported pursuant to this section in its report to the Legislature pursuant to Section 916.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 51.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

916.2.

The commission shall annually report to the Legislature, on or before July 1, on sites on railroad lines in the state it finds to be hazardous. The report shall include, but not be limited to, information on all of the following:

(a) A list of all railroad derailment accident sites in the state on which accidents have occurred within at least the previous five years. The list shall describe the nature and probable causes of the accidents, if known, and shall indicate whether the accidents occurred at or near sites that the commission has determined, pursuant to subdivision (b), pose a local safety hazard.

(b) A list of all railroad sites in
 the state that the commission determines, pursuant to Section 20106 of Title 49 of the United States Code, pose a local safety hazard. The commission may submit in the annual report the list of railroad sites submitted in the immediate prior year annual report, and may amend or revise that list from the immediate prior year as necessary. Factors that the commission shall consider in determining a local safety hazard may include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The severity of grade and curve of track.

(2) The value of special skills of train operators in negotiating the particular segment of railroad line.

(3) The value of special railroad equipment in negotiating the particular segment of railroad line.

(4) The types of
 commodities transported on or near the particular segment of railroad line.

(5) The hazard posed by the release of the commodity into the environment.

(6) The value of special railroad equipment in the process of safely loading, transporting, storing, or unloading potentially hazardous commodities.

(7) The proximity of railroad activity to human activity or sensitive environmental areas.

(8) A list of the root causes and significant contributing factors of all train accidents or derailments investigated.

(c) In determining which railroad sites pose a local safety hazard pursuant to subdivision (b), the commission shall consider the history of accidents at or near the sites. The commission
 shall not limit its determination to sites at which accidents have already occurred, but shall identify potentially hazardous sites based on the criteria enumerated in subdivision (b) and all other criteria that the commission determines influence railroad safety. The commission shall also consider whether any local safety hazards at railroad sites have been eliminated or sufficiently remediated to warrant removal of the site from the list required under subdivision (b).

(d) The commission may combine the information required to be reported by this section with the report prepared pursuant to Section 916.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 7711 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 67.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

916.3.

(a) The commission shall annually report to the Legislature on or before November 30 of each year on its compliance with the requirements of Section 765.5. The annual report shall include a determination by the commission of the impact on competition, if any, of the regulatory fees assessed railroad corporations and motor carriers for the support of the commission’s activities.

(b) The commission may combine the information required by this section with the report prepared pursuant to Section 916.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 765.6 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 22.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

916.4.

An action taken by the commission on a safety recommendation letter or safety advisory pursuant to Section 765 shall be reported annually, in detail, to the Legislature with the report required by Section 910. Correspondence from the federal National Transportation Safety Board indicating that a recommendation has been closed following an action that the federal National Transportation Safety Board finds unacceptable shall be noted in the report required by Section 910.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 52.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

916.5.

By January 1 of each year, the commission shall submit to the Legislature a detailed budget for the expenditure of railroad corporation fees for the ensuing budget year, consistent with Section 421.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 425, Sec. 8.   (SB 385)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

918.

The commission shall, within 30 days prior to commencement of the regular session of the Legislature, submit to the Governor a full and true report of transactions under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 5001) of Division 2 during the preceding biennium, including a complete statement of receipts and expenditures during the period.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5006 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 60.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

918.2.

The commission and the Department of Insurance shall collaborate on a study of transportation network company insurance to assess whether coverage requirements are appropriate to the risk of transportation network company services in order to promote data-driven decisions on insurance requirements, and shall report the findings of this study to the Legislature no later than December 31, 2017.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5436 by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 53.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

918.3.

(a) The commission and the Department of Insurance shall collaborate on a study of the impacts of the requirements established for uninsured motorist coverage and underinsured motorist coverage under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5433 to assess whether those coverage requirements are appropriate to the risk of transportation network company services in order to promote data-driven decisions on insurance requirements, and shall report the findings of this study to the Assembly Committee on Insurance and the Senate Committee on Insurance on or before December 31, 2030.

(b) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section shall become inoperative on December 31, 2034, and, as of January 1, 2035, is
 repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 314, Sec. 2.   (SB 371)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative December 31, 2034, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

920.

(a) (1) Unless expressly directed otherwise, a report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this article is to be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, except that an electronic copy may be submitted to the Secretary of the Senate, unless specifically requested to submit a printed copy of the report, with an electronic copy submitted to Legislative Counsel in compliance with subdivision (c) of Section 10242.5 of the Government Code.

(2) Any report that is expressly directed to be submitted to a committee of the Legislature shall be submitted as an electronic copy, unless specifically requested to submit a printed copy by chair of that committee,
 with an electronic copy submitted to Legislative Counsel in compliance with subdivision (c) of Section 10242.5 of the Government Code.

(b) Any report required to be submitted to the Governor pursuant to this article shall be submitted as an electronic copy unless specifically requested to submit a printed copy of the report by the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 54.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Building Initiative for Low-Emissions Development (BUILD) Program [921. - 921.1.]

921.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Disadvantaged community” means a community identified as a disadvantaged community pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Eligible applicants” means owners or developers of new residential housing.

(c) “Low-income community” means a census tract or equivalent geographic area defined by the United States Census Bureau in which at least 50 percent of households have an income less than 60 percent of the area median gross income.

(d) “Low-income residential housing” means either of the
 following:

(1) A multifamily residential building of at least two rental housing units that is operated to provide deed-restricted low-income residential housing, as described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2852, and that meets one or both of the following conditions:

(A) The property is located in a disadvantaged community or low-income community.

(B) At least 80 percent of the households living in the building have incomes at or below 60 percent of the area median income, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) An individual low-income residence, as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2852.

(e) (1) “Near-zero-emission building technology” means technology that reduces both of the following:

(A) The energy demands of a building on the electrical or gas distribution system.

(B) The direct and indirect emissions of greenhouse gases from buildings.

(2) Near-zero-emission building technology includes a single technology, such as heat pumps, solar thermal systems, or advanced energy efficiency systems, and a combination of technologies, such as a solar photovoltaic system with an energy storage system.

(f) “Program” means the Building Initiative for Low-Emissions Development (BUILD) Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 378, Sec. 4.   (SB 1477)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

921.1.

(a) (1) The commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, shall develop and supervise the administration of the Building Initiative for Low-Emissions Development (BUILD) Program to require gas corporations to provide incentives to eligible applicants for the deployment of near-zero-emission building technologies to significantly reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases from those buildings below the minimum projected emissions reductions that would otherwise be expected to result from the implementation of the prescriptive standards described in Section 150.1 of Subchapter 8 of Part 6 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The commission may determine whether each gas corporation or a third party,
 including the Energy Commission, shall administer the program.

(3) Moneys allocated pursuant to Section 748.6 shall be available to each gas corporation, or the third-party administrator, for allocation consistent with this section.

(b) The amount of the incentive provided pursuant to the program shall take into account the availability of existing incentives and shall be based on the projected amount of reduction in the emissions of greenhouse gases resulting from the installation of the near-zero-emission building technology. The commission shall set the incentives to encourage building designs that reduce greenhouse gas emissions beyond industry practices and to offer greater incentives for larger projected greenhouse gas emissions reductions. Incentives for buildings that serve low-income residents may have different standards from those that serve other residents.

(c) (1) To encourage the adoption of near-zero-emission building technologies in new low-income residential housing located in disadvantaged communities or low-income communities, the program shall reserve a minimum of 30 percent of the amount allocated pursuant to Section 748.6 for new low-income residential housing.

(2) If, following the implementation of the outreach plan pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (d), the moneys reserved pursuant to paragraph (1) remain unspent two years after those moneys were reserved, the commission shall evaluate potential changes to the program to increase participation and may make those moneys, or a portion of those moneys, available for other purposes consistent with the program.

(d) In supervising the administration of the program, the commission shall
 do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that projects funded with moneys reserved pursuant to subdivision (c) are offered technical assistance to encourage the use of the program.

(2) Provide higher incentives for buildings described in subdivision (c) than for installations in other new residential buildings.

(3) Ensure that projects funded with moneys reserved pursuant to subdivision (c) do not result in higher utility bills for building occupants.

(4) (A) Develop program guidelines that include, at a minimum, a list of eligible technologies, a process for evaluating new technologies, criteria for scoring and selecting projects, and a process and set of metrics by which to evaluate and track the program’s results.

(B) Program metrics shall include, at a minimum, the number of low-emission systems installed in each building type, projected utility bill savings, and the cost per metric ton of avoided greenhouse gas emissions.

(5) Implement an outreach plan to encourage applications for projects funded with moneys reserved pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) Each gas corporation shall provide the commission with any information required by the commission to complete the report on the program required pursuant to Section 910.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 378, Sec. 4.   (SB 1477)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Technology and Equipment for Clean Heating (TECH) Initiative [922. - 922.]

922.

(a) (1) The commission shall develop and supervise the administration of the Technology and Equipment for Clean Heating (TECH) Initiative, a statewide market development initiative, to require gas corporations to advance the state’s market for low-emission space and water heating equipment for new and existing residential buildings through upstream market development, consumer education, contractor and vendor training, and the provision of upstream and midstream incentives to install low-emission space and water heating equipment in existing and new buildings, with technologies identified pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The commission may determine whether each gas corporation or a third party, including the Energy
 Commission, shall administer the TECH Initiative.

(b) As a part of the TECH Initiative, the commission shall identify and target key low-emission space and water heating equipment technologies that are in an early stage of market development and would assist the state in achieving the state’s greenhouse gas emissions reduction goal for 2030 and other long-term greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals established by the Legislature. In identifying and targeting these technologies, the commission shall give consideration to technologies that have the greatest potential to reduce greenhouse gas emissions in California and that improve the health and safety of, and energy affordability for, low-income households.

(c) (1) In supervising the administration of the TECH Initiative, the commission, in coordination with the Energy Commission, shall develop guidelines
 and evaluation metrics, implement outreach strategies for hard-to-reach customers, and provide for job training and employment opportunities.

(2) (A) The guidelines shall include, at a minimum, a list of eligible technologies, a process for evaluating new technologies, and a process and set of metrics by which to evaluate and track the TECH Initiative’s results.

(B) The metrics shall include, but are not limited to, the market share for eligible technologies, projected utility bill savings, and the cost per metric ton of avoided greenhouse gas emissions.

(d) Moneys allocated pursuant to Section 748.6 shall be available to each gas corporation, or the third-party administrator, for allocation consistent with this section.

(e) Each
 gas corporation shall provide the commission with any information required by the commission to complete the report on the TECH Initiative required pursuant to Section 910.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 378, Sec. 5.   (SB 1477)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.5. Powering Up Californians [930. - 940.]

930.

This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Powering Up Californians Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

931.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Electrification” means any new, expanded, or change in use of electricity related to the policies described in Section 933, including, but not limited to, in the industrial, commercial, agricultural, housing, or transportation sectors.

(b) “Energization” and “energize” mean connecting customers to the electrical distribution grid and establishing adequate electrical distribution capacity or upgrading electrical distribution or transmission capacity to provide electrical service for a new customer, or to provide upgraded electrical service to an existing customer. The determination of adequate electrical distribution capacity includes
 consideration of future load. “Energization” and “energize” do not include activities related to connecting electrical supply resources.

(c) “Energization time period” means the elapsed time beginning when the electrical corporation receives a substantially complete energization project application and ending when the electric service is installed and energized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

932.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) It is the policy of the state to reach carbon neutrality no later than 2045 and to maintain net negative emissions of greenhouse gases after 2045. To meet these goals and federal, state, regional, and local air quality and decarbonization standards, plans, and regulations, projections from the commission and the Energy Commission show the need for a large increase in both the quantity of electricity used and the functions for which electricity will be used.

(2) To meet these decarbonization goals and federal, state, regional, and local air quality and decarbonization standards, plans, and regulations, the state’s
 electrical distribution systems must be substantially upgraded, new customers must promptly connect to the electrical distribution system, and existing customers must have their service level promptly upgraded.

(3) There are many reports of large housing developments that are unable to be promptly energized. California has an urgent need to increase its supply of housing, requiring both new electrical distribution capacity and the prompt energization of new housing.

(4) There are many reports of individual customers who are unable to have their electrical service promptly upgraded or energized and charging stations for light-duty, medium-duty, and heavy-duty vehicles and off-road vehicles, vessels, trains, and equipment that are unable to be promptly energized. These delays may inhibit the state’s ability to meet its decarbonization goals and federal, state, regional, and local
 air quality and decarbonization standards, plans, and regulations.

(5) To improve the speed at which energization and service upgrades are performed, each electrical corporation that distributes electricity must improve its advance planning, engineering, and construction of increased distribution and transmission system capacity.

(6) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (s) of Section 712.8 requires the operator of the Diablo Canyon powerplant to submit annually to the commission for its review the amount of compensation earned under paragraph (5) of subdivision (f) of Section 712.8, how it was spent, and a plan for prioritizing the uses of the compensation the next year. Paragraph (1) of subdivision (s) of Section 712.8 also provides that to the extent that it is not needed for Diablo Canyon, that compensation shall be spent on critical public purpose priorities, one of which is
 accelerating customer and generator interconnections.

(7) Electrifying transportation and buildings may put downward pressure on rates by spreading fixed costs over more kilowatthours of usage.

(8) Delays in energization, including service upgrades, are costly both to the customers awaiting service and to other customers deprived of the downward pressure on rates.

(9) To carry out the planning, engineering, and construction of electrical distribution systems needed to promptly serve customers, each electrical corporation that distributes electricity must recruit, train, and retain an adequately sized, qualified workforce.

(10) The commission should establish target deadlines for utilities that distribute electricity to energize new customers and upgrade
 the service of existing customers.

(11) The commission should establish reporting requirements requiring each electrical corporation that distributes electricity to report the extent to which it complied with the target deadlines and the reasons for its noncompliance.

(b) Nothing in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) changes the requirements of Section 712.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

933.

It is the policy of the state that each electrical corporation does all of the following:

(a) Upgrade the state’s electrical distribution systems as needed and in time to achieve the state’s decarbonization goals and implement federal, state, regional, and local air quality and decarbonization standards, plans, and regulations.

(b) Comply with its obligation to serve, as provided in Section 451, by conducting sufficient advance planning, engineering, and construction of increased distribution system capacity so that customers can be energized without substantial delay.

(c) Promptly energize new customers, including by ensuring that new
 housing, new businesses, new electric equipment in buildings, and new charging for light-duty, medium-duty, and heavy-duty vehicles and off-road vehicles, vessels, trains, and equipment can be used without delay caused by a failure of the electrical corporation to implement energization projects.

(d) Promptly upgrade service when needed by customers.

(e) Recruit, train, and retain an adequately sized and qualified workforce to carry out the planning, engineering, and construction of electrical distribution systems needed to promptly serve customers seeking energization and service upgrades without sacrificing other necessary activities of the workforce.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

933.5.

(a) The commission shall determine the criteria for timely service for electric customers to be energized. The criteria shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Categories of timely electric service through energization, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(A) The
 timely start of service, and timely fulfillment of requests, for energization, including new service connections and increased load from existing service connections after a customer has submitted a request for new or increased electrical load.

(B) Project types that justify unique or extended energization timelines. These may include, but are not limited to, projects requiring substantial upstream capacity upgrades or substation upgrades, unanticipated engineering or construction work, or projects requiring energization of significant, unanticipated new load.

(2) (A) Establishing annual reporting requirements, while leveraging existing reporting requirements for interconnections of generation and storage wherever possible, for the electrical corporations to report customer energization projects in order to evaluate the electrical corporations fulfillment of timely electric service.

(B) At a minimum, the
 reporting requirements shall include all of the following:

(i) The average, median, and standard deviation time between receiving an application for energizing the electrical service.

(ii) Explanations for energization time periods that exceed the target maximum for energization projects.

(iii) Constraints and obstacles to each type of energization, including funding limitations, qualified staffing availability, or equipment availability.

(iv) Any other information required by the commission.

(3) Annually convening a public workshop for the electrical corporations to discuss their reports with interested parties and experts in customer energization, including representatives from local governments, and to examine existing workflows and potential improvements to planning, timelines, processes, and customer communication and education, and criteria for determining timely service of energization requests. The workshops shall inform the commission in its determination of the criteria for timely service of energization for electric customers, and any subsequent revisions to established criteria.

(b) (1) In order to demonstrate improvement in energization performance and the resolution of backlogs of customers waiting for
 electricity, each electrical corporation that energized less than 35 percent of customers with completed applications exceeding 12 months in duration by January 31, 2023, shall submit a report to the commission, on or before December 1, 2024, demonstrating that the
 electrical corporation has energized 80 percent of customers with applications deemed complete as of January 31, 2023, excluding applications withdrawn, canceled, or with customer-requested energization dates beyond December 1, 2024. The commission may conduct an analysis of current energization status and adjust these thresholds and deadlines.

(2) If an electrical corporation fails to meet the performance metric in paragraph (1), the electrical corporation shall
 implement actions necessary to meet the performance metric and include a summary of these actions in the report submitted to the commission.

(3) Reports submitted to the commission pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Be posted online to the commission’s and the electrical corporation’s internet websites.

(B) Include the number of withdrawn applications and aggregated data on the reasons, if any, given by customers for withdrawal.

(C) Include the number of canceled applications and aggregated data
 on the reasons for which the electrical
 corporation, or, if applicable, the customer, canceled the request.

(D) Include the number of projects delayed due to factors outside the electrical corporation’s control and aggregated data by factors, including, but not limited to, supply shortages and local permitting delays.

(c) (1) To improve the accuracy of projected demand and facilitate achievement of the goal of timely electric service through energization, each electrical corporation shall evaluate and update, as necessary, its existing distribution planning processes.

(2) To improve the accuracy of projected demand, each electrical corporation shall have annual meetings with interested parties and experts in customer energization, including representatives from local governments and the relevant county staff for each interested county in its service territory, which is presumed to include chief administrative officers, planning directors, public works directors, chief building officials, and economic development officials, to discuss relevant information, which may include, but is not limited to, customer service, existing capacity, planned capacity upgrades, projected local demand, local development plans, significant delays in customer energization in the county, distribution planning, existing workflows, and potential improvements to planning, timelines, processes, and customer
 communication and education.

(3) To increase the pace and scale of local projects intended to meet state, regional, and local housing and economic development objectives, each electrical corporation shall share relevant information, which may include, but is not limited to, data available through the integrated capacity analysis tool, upon request with local governments about those areas where existing capacity either exists or could be easily added, and where existing capacity is planned to be added, within the distribution system to meet those objectives. Local government employees authorized to request information include chief administrative officers, planning directors, public works directors, chief building officials, economic
 development officials, and city managers.

(d) (1) In order to inform the commission’s determination of criteria for timely service pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall annually collect the following information from each electrical corporation in the form of a report:

(A) The number of submitted requests for energization of new customer connections and upgraded service during the prior year.

(B) The number of completed requests for energization of new customer connections and upgraded service during the prior year.

(C) The number of pending
 and uncompleted requests for energization of new customer connections and upgraded service at the end of the prior year.

(D) The number of days between requests for energization of new customer connections or upgraded service and final service delivery.

(E) A summary of recorded spending on energization of customer connections and service upgrades compared to the amounts authorized for these activities for that year in the most recent general rate case.

(F) Any other information requested by the commission to evaluate the status of energization of customer connections and service upgrades.

(2) This subdivision shall apply only to energization of
 customers and does not include interconnection of generation resources to either the distribution or transmission grid.

(3) The reporting requirement in this subdivision shall become inoperative once the commission establishes new reporting requirements for monitoring timely electric service pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(e) The commission may modify or adjust the requirements of this section for any electrical corporation with fewer than 100,000 service connections, as individual circumstances merit.

(f) This section shall not apply to an electrical cooperative, as defined in Section 2776.

(g) For purposes of this section, “energization” and “energize” mean connecting customers to the electrical distribution grid and
 establishing adequate electrical distribution capacity or upgrading electrical distribution or transmission capacity to provide electrical service for a new customer, or to provide upgraded electrical service to an existing customer. The determination of adequate electrical distribution capacity includes consideration of future load. “Energization” and
 “energize” do not include activities related to connecting electrical supply resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   (AB 50)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

934.

(a) On or before September 30, 2024, the commission shall do both of the following:

(1) Establish reasonable average and maximum target energization time periods. The targets shall ensure that work is completed in a manner that minimizes delay in meeting the date requested by the customer to the greatest extent possible and prioritizes work in a manner consistent with Sections 932 and 933. The targets may vary depending on the complexity and magnitude of the work required and uncertainties regarding the readiness of the customer project needing energization. The targets may also recognize any factors beyond the electrical corporation’s control.

(2) Establish a procedure for customers to report
 energization delays to the commission.
